Utah statutes.
48-1-48.   Limited liability partnerships providing professional services.

(1)  A limited liability partnership organized under Sections 48-1-41 through 48-1-48 to render professional services may render only one specific type of professional service, and services ancillary to that type of professional service, and may not engage in any business other than rendering the professional service that it was organized to render and services ancillary to those services.

(2)  A limited liability partnership organized to render professional services:

(a)  may include partners and employees authorized under the laws of the jurisdiction where they reside to provide similar services;

(b)  may include partners who are not licensed or registered by the state to render those professional services to the extent allowed by the applicable licensing act relating to those professional services; and

(c)  may render professional services in Utah only through its partners and employees who are licensed or registered by the state to render those professional services.

(3)  A limited liability partnership organized to render professional services shall have the powers provided a limited liability partnership under this chapter.

